Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-2920
Tax credit; limitation on total amount.

The total amount of tax credit granted for programs approved and certified under the Community Development Assistance Act by the department for any fiscal year shall not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars.

Laws 2025, LB650, § 8.